Washington statutes.
RCW 26.34.080

Violations—Penalty.

Any person, firm, corporation, association or agency which places a child in the state of Washington without meeting the requirements set forth herein, or any person, firm, corporation, association or agency which receives a child in the state of Washington, where there has been no compliance with the requirements set forth herein, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor. Each day of violation shall constitute a separate offense.

[ 1971 ex.s. c 168 s 8.]